Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.025

Authorization.

Any governmental unit has power to establish and maintain a library, either by itself or in cooperation with one or more other governmental units.

[ 1941 c 65 s 2; 1935 c 119 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8226-3. Formerly RCW 27.12.020, part.]